District of Columbia statutes.
47-4402

Credit card or electronic payment of taxes.

(a)

For purposes of this section, “electronic funds transfer” means a transfer of funds, other than a transaction by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephone, or computer or magnetic tape for the purpose of ordering, instructing, or authorizing a financial institution to debit or credit an account. The term includes point of sale transfers, automated teller machine transfers, direct deposit or withdrawal of funds, transfers initiated by telephone, and transfers resulting from debit card transactions.

(b)

The Mayor may accept payment of taxes by credit card or electronic funds transfer. The Mayor may contract with a bank or credit card vendor, or third party provider, for the acceptance of the credit card or other form of payment, with any fee or charge for the election to use this method of payment absorbed by the taxpayer, or, in the alternative, paid to the vendor or contractor out of the monies collected. If the taxpayer elects to pay by one of these methods, the payment shall not be deemed to be made until the District receives the funds.

(c)

The Mayor may require non-individual taxpayers to make payments electronically if the amount of the payment due for a period exceeds $5,000.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7131, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 7062, 59 DCR 8025

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-102.03.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-111, in subsec. (c), substituted “$10,000” for “$25,000”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “$5,000” for “$10,000” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7071 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7131 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7131 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short Title

Short title: Section 7130 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle K of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Non-Individual Income Tax Electronic Filing Act of 2009”.